Georgia, session 2025_26, HB546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 15 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to miscellaneous provisions under the "Quality Basic Education Act," is amended
by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"20-2-324.8.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'home study student' means a student in grades
six through 12 who is in a home study program that meets the requirements of
subsection (c) of Code Section 20-2-690.
H. B. 546
- 1 -

LC 61 0153
(b) A local school system that offers the PSAT/NMSQT, SAT, PreACT, ACT, or Armed
Services Vocational Aptitude Battery (ASVAB) or an advanced placement exam to
students enrolled in such local school system shall:
(1) Make each such test or exam available to any home study student who would be
enrolled in such local school system by virtue of his or her residence under the same
rules, policies, and procedures for such test or exam that apply to students enrolled in
such local school system who are participating in such test or exam. Such test or exam
may be offered to such home study students at the same date and time that such test or
exam is offered to students enrolled in such local school system, or at another date and
time selected by such local school system; and
(2) Post on its public website notice of each such test or exam to be administered. Such
notice shall:
(A) Include each such test or exam date;
(B) Include registration deadlines and procedures; and
(C) State that such test or exam is available to home study students who would be
enrolled in such local school system by virtue of their residence.
(c) A local school system that offers the PSAT/NMSQT, SAT, PreACT, ACT, or Armed
Services Vocational Aptitude Battery (ASVAB) or an advanced placement exam to
students enrolled in such local school system shall not, as a condition of a home study
student participating in such test or exam:
(1) Impose any fee that is not imposed on students enrolled in such local school system;
or
(2) Impose any requirement that conflicts with or is in addition to the requirements of
subsection (c) of Code Section 20-2-690."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 546
- 2 -